Massachusetts, session 194th, H1597.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 125 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 22. No administrator or superintendent of any correctional institution, including
any correctional facility, county correctional facility, penal institution, state correctional facility,
state prison, or jail, shall transfer any inmate or prisoner outside of the commonwealth; and no
inmate or prisoner of any correctional institution, including any correctional facility, county
correctional facility, penal institution, state correctional facility, state prison, or jail, shall be
transferred outside of the commonwealth, for the purpose of engaging in labor outside of the
Commonwealth.
of 1